test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ilje_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - илʼ: # Noun 'life' - partial paradigm /Type 30/
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom: илʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc: иламʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen: илаʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat: иландʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc: илӈгана
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl: илӈгад
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros: илмана
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom: илаӈгʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc: илаӈгʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen: илаӈгʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom: илаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc: илъе
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen: илъеˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat: илаӈгˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc: илӈгаˮна
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl: илӈгат
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros: илъеˮмна    

     илʼ+N+Tra: илӈэ
     илʼ+N+Car: иланзиˮ
     илʼ+N+Equ: иландаремʼ
     илʼ+N+Equ+Lat: иландаревʼ

# Possessive forms !Local case forms need to be checked!
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: илам
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: илал
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: иланда 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: иламиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: илиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: иландиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: иламаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: илалаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: иландоʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: илам  
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: иланд  
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: иланда 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: иламиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: иландиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: иландиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: иламаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: иландаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: иландоʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: илан
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: иланд  
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: иланда 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: иланиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: иландиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: иландиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: иланаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: иландаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: иландоʼ  
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: илӈган
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: илӈганд  
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: илӈганда 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: илӈганиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: илӈгандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: илӈгандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: илӈганаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: илӈгандаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: илӈгандоʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: илӈганан
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: илӈгананд  
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: илӈгананда 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: илӈгананиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: илӈганандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: илӈганандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: илӈгананаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: илӈганандаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: илӈганандоʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: илӈгадан
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: илӈгаданд  
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: илӈгаданда 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: илӈгаданиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: илӈгадандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: илӈгадандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: илӈгаданаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: илӈгадандаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: илӈгадандоʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: илманан
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: илмананд  
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: илмананда 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: илмананиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: илманандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: илманандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: илмананаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: илманандаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: илманандоʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: илӈгаюн  
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: илӈгаюд  
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: илӈгаюда 
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: илӈгаюниʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: илӈгаюдиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: илӈгаюдиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: илӈгаюнаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: илӈгаюдаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: илӈгаюдоʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: илӈгаюн  
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: илӈгаюд  
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: илӈгаюда 
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: илӈгаюниʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: илӈгаюдиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: илӈгаюдиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: илӈгаюнаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: илӈгаюдаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: илӈгаюдоʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: илӈгаюн  
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: илӈгают  
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: илӈгаюта 
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: илӈгаюниʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: илӈгаютиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: илӈгаютиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: илӈгаюнаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: илӈгаютаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: илӈгаютоʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: илъен
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: илъед   
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: илъеда  
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: илъениʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: илъедиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: илъедиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: илъенаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: илъедаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: илъедоʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: илъен   
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: илъед   
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: илъеда  
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: илъениʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: илъедиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: илъедиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: илъенаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: илъедаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: илъедоʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: илъеˮн  
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: илъет   
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: илъета  
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: илъеˮниʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: илъетиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: илъетиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: илъеˮнаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: илъетаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: илъетоʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: илӈгаˮн 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: илӈгат 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: илӈгата 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: илӈгаˮниʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: илӈгатиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: илӈгатиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: илӈгаˮнаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: илӈгатаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: илӈгатоʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: илӈгаˮнан  
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: илӈгаˮнат
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: илӈгаˮната 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: илӈгаˮнаниʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: илӈгаˮнатиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: илӈгаˮнатиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: илӈгаˮнанаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: илӈгаˮнатаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: илӈгаˮнатоʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: илӈгатан 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: илӈгатат 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: илӈгатата 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: илӈгатаниʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: илӈгататиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: илӈгататиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: илӈгатанаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: илӈгататаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: илӈгататоʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: илъеˮмнан       
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: илъеˮмнат  
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: илъеˮмната 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: илъеˮмнаниʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: илъеˮмнатиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: илъеˮмнатиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: илъеˮмнанаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: илъеˮмнатаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: илъеˮмнатоʼ

# Predestinative 

     илʼ+N+Pred+Abs: иланд
     илʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [илндав, иландав, илндув, иландув]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: [илндар, иландар]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [илндада, иландада]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [илндамиʼ, иландамиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [илндариʼ, иландариʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [илндадиʼ, иландадиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [илндаваˮ, иландаваˮ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [илндараˮ, иландараˮ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [илндадоʼ, иландадоʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [илндав, иландав, илндув, иландув]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: [илндамд, иландамд]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: [илндамда, иландмда]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [илндамиʼ, иландамиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: [илндамдиʼ, иландамдиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: [илндамдиʼ, иландамдиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [илндаваˮ, иландаваˮ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: [илндамдаˮ, иландамдаˮ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: [илндамдоʼ, иландамдоʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [илндан, иландан]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: [илнданд, иланданд]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: [илнданда, иланданда]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [илнданиʼ, иланданиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: [илндандиʼ, иландандиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: [илндандиʼ, иландандиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [илнданаˮ, иланданаˮ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: [илндандаˮ, иландандаˮ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: [илндандоʼ, иландандоʼ]

# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: иландмʼ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: иланд  
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: илʼ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: илниʼ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: иландиʼ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: илаӈгʼ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: илмаˮ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: иландаˮ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: илаˮ  
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: иландамзь
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: иландась 
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: иланзь   
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: илнинзь
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: иландинзь
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: илӈганзь
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: илмаць 
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: иландаць 
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: илаць   
